Wyoming, session 2026, HB0076.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-1-406(c) is repealed.

Section 2. This act shall apply to annexation
proceedings commenced under W.S. 15-1-404 on or after July
1, 2026.

HB0076

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0307
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0076